Arkansas, session 2025, HB1320.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 20-47-813 is amended to read as follows:
20-47-813. Rulemaking authority Rules.
(a) The Department of Human Services is authorized to utilize
rulemaking in order to properly implement the provisions of this subchapter
concerning the certification of a nonhospital crisis stabilization unit.
(b) The department shall not promulgate a rule concerning utilization
criteria that limits access to crisis stabilization units unless the rule is
*ANS172*
01/30/2025 11:00:22 AM ANS172

HB1320
adopted in conjunction with the Insurance Commissioner.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 23-99-203(d), concerning the definition of
"healthcare provider" under the Patient Protection Act of 1995, is amended to
add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(31) Crisis stabilization units.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 23-99-802(4), concerning the definition of
"healthcare provider" as used under the any willing provider laws, is amended
to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(GG) Crisis stabilization units.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 99, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:

Subchapter 19 — Crisis Stabilization Units

23-99-1901. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Crisis stabilization unit" means the same as defined in §
20-47-803;
(2)(A) "Health benefit plan" means any individual, blanket, or
group plan, policy, or contract for healthcare services issued or delivered
by a healthcare insurer in this state.
(B) "Health benefit plan" includes a nonfederal self-
funded governmental plan.
(C) "Health benefit plan" does not include a plan that
includes only dental benefits or eye and vision care benefits;
(3)(A) "Healthcare insurer" means an entity that:
(i) Is subject to state insurance regulation,
including without limitation an insurance company, a health maintenance
organization, a hospital and medical service corporation, a risk-based
provider organization, and a sponsor of a nonfederal self-funded governmental
plan; or
(ii) Has subscribers in this state.
(B) "Healthcare insurer" includes Medicaid if Medicaid
01/30/2025 11:00:22 AM ANS172

HB1320
services are managed or reimbursed by a healthcare insurer.
(C) “Healthcare insurer” does not include:
(i) A workers' compensation plan; or
(ii) An entity that provides only dental benefits or
eye and vision care benefits;
(4) "Healthcare provider" means:
(A) A doctor of medicine, a doctor of osteopathy, or
another licensed healthcare professional acting within the healthcare
professional's licensed scope of practice; or
(B) A healthcare facility licensed in the state where the
facility is located to provide healthcare services;
(5) "Healthcare service" means a healthcare procedure,
treatment, or service provided by a healthcare provider; and
(6) "Medicaid" means the state-federal medical assistance
program established by Title XIX of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396
et seq.

23-99-1902. Behavioral or medical management utilization limitations,
measures, or controls.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, a health
benefit plan shall not impose or apply any behavioral or medical management
utilization limitations, measures, or controls for healthcare services by a
crisis stabilization unit unless the behavioral or medical management
limitations, measures, or controls are equivalent to, or consistent with,
limitations applied to the same healthcare services by Medicaid.
(b) The Insurance Commissioner may authorize behavioral or medical
management utilization limitations, measures, or controls for healthcare
services by a crisis stabilization unit by rule.

23-99-1903. Prior authorization or precertification.
A health benefit plan shall not require prior authorization or
precertification for a healthcare service provided by a crisis stabilization
unit unless the healthcare service requires a prior authorization by rule of
the Insurance Commissioner.

23-99-1904. Rules.
01/30/2025 11:00:22 AM ANS172

HB1320
The Insurance Commissioner may promulgate rules to implement this
subchapter.


































01/30/2025 11:00:22 AM ANS172